District of Columbia statutes.
29-1004.04

Voting by district, class, or voting group.

(a)

This section shall apply if the organic rules provide for voting by district or class or if there is one or more identifiable voting groups that a proposed amendment to the organic rules would affect differently from other members with respect to matters identified in § 29-1004.05(e)(1) through (5). Approval of the amendment shall require the same percentage of votes of the members of that district, class, or voting group required in §§ 29-1004.05 and 29-1005.14.

(b)

If a proposed amendment to the organic rules would affect members in 2 or more districts or classes entitled to vote separately under subsection (a) of this section in the same or a substantially similar way, the districts or classes affected shall vote as a single voting group unless the organic rules otherwise provide for separate voting.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-1001.09, § 29-1001.13, § 29-1004.05, § 29-1014.04, and § 29-1015.04.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 404 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.